Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1407
Jurisdiction; territorial application.

The Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act applies to, regulates, and determines rights, obligations, and remedies under a rental agreement, wherever made, for a dwelling unit located within this state.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 6.